Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.225

Professional gambling—Penalties not applicable to authorized activities.

The penalties provided for professional gambling in this chapter shall not apply to the activities authorized by this chapter when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

[ 1987 c 4 s 37. Formerly RCW 9.46.030(11).]